Hawaii, session 2026, GM1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that waste from the use
of disposable electronic smoking devices poses significant
environmental problems. Disposable electronic smoking devices
are not recyclable, contain hazardous components like lithium
batteries and liquid nicotine, and contribute to plastic
pollution, landfill fires, and toxic chemical leaching into
waterways. According to a study conducted by Truth Initiative,
the nation's J^argest nonprofit public health organization
dedicated to preventing youth nicotine addiction, over half of
young people surveyed discarded their disposable electronic
smoking devices in the trash, with less than a quarter reporting
that they recycled their devices.
The legislature further finds that the local and global
impact of the world’s increasing waste stream is unsustainable
and detrimental to the environmental integrity of the State.
The exponential rise in single-use plastics and bioplastics has
worsened problems related to street and beach litter, ocean
2026-2509 SB2175 GDI SMA-2.docx
iNiiiimHiinMiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. "0'2
C.D. 1
pollution, and marine and other wildlife harm. An estimated
eighty per cent of marine debris originates on land, primarily
as escaped refuse and litter, much of it plastic, via urban
runoff. It is now estimated that 8,750,000 metric tons of
plastic enter the ocean each year from land-based sources.
The legislature also finds that lithium-ion batteries used
in disposable electronic smoking devices pose significant fire
risks. Despite laws regulating the disposal of lithium-ion
batteries, many are improperly discarded and end up in landfills
or other inappropriate parts of the solid waste management
system. The improper disposal of rechargeable lithium-ion
batteries creates unnecessary safety hazards for workers and
surrounding residents, while also posing environmental threats
to the State's land and water resources, including the aquifer.
According to the Bureau of Investigative Journalism, at
least five disposable electronic smoking devices are being
thrown away every second in the United States, amounting to one
hundred fifty million devices per year. Yet, clear disposal
guidance from federal regulatory agencies and disposable
electronic smoking device manufacturers is lacking, leaving
state and local governments responsible for establishing
2026-2509 SB2175 GDI SMA-2.docx
lllinMIIlNIIHUHIIHHir

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
CD. 1
standards to manage the environmental risks associated with
disposable electronic smoking devices.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to protect the
environment from hazardous waste associated with disposable
electronic smoking devices by banning the sale of these devices
throughout the State.
SECTION 2. Chapter 328J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§328J- Disposable electronic smoking devices;
prohibited. (a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, it shall be
unlawful for any person or entity to sell, offer for sale, or
distribute for sale any disposable electronic smoking device in
the State.
(b) The sale, offer for sale, or distribution for sale of
between one to twenty disposable electronic smoking devices
shall constitute a violation of this section.
(c) Violations of subsection (a) shall be subject to a
fine of up to $100 per day for each violation.
(d) For the purposes of this section, "disposable
electronic smoking device" means an electronic smoking device,
2026-2509 SB2175 CDl SMA-2.docx
iininniiiNiiiiiniiiMiHiiiiiM

Page 4 S.B. NO. ""z
C.D. 1
as defined in section 245-1, that is non-refillable, has a
non-rechargeable battery, and is intended to be disposed of
after the contents inside the electronic smoking device have
been used. "Disposable electronic smoking device" does not
include a device authorized for sale by a marketing granted
order issued by the United States Food and Drug Administration
pursuant to title 21 United States Code section 387j."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2509 SB2175 CDl SMA-2.docx 4
■iiiiningiiiiiiiiiililiHin

S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 7th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2175, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the
92-26

SB No. 2175, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives